District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.54

Quarterly summary.

The CFO shall submit to the Mayor and the Council a quarterly summary of all capital project closures conducted pursuant to this subchapter.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11k [11l]
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 9002, 59 DCR 8025

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Section 9012 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that beginning October 1, 2012, the Mayor shall submit to the Council, on a quarterly basis, a report certified by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia providing the lists of the projects or accounts to which any budget obligations or cash expenditures have been charged or reclassified under the Office of Contracting and Procurement’s Article 3 provision for emergency approval of expenditures for the District Department of Transportation. The quarterly reports shall include documentation of sufficient capital budget to support the obligations or expenditures.